Louisiana, session 2026, HB292.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:3251(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3251. Lessee's deposit to secure lease; retention by lessor; conveyance of leased
premises; itemized statement by lessor
A. Any advance or deposit of money furnished by a tenant or lessee to a
landlord or lessor to secure the performance of any part of a written or oral lease or
rental agreement shall be returned to the tenant or lessee of residential or dwelling
premises within one month after the lease shall terminate. except that However, the
landlord or lessor may retain all or any portion of the advance or deposit which is
reasonably necessary to remedy a default of the tenant or to remedy unreasonable
wear to the premises. If any portion of an advance or deposit is retained by a
landlord or lessor, he shall forward to the tenant or lessee, within one month after the
date the tenancy terminates or within fifteen days after the date that is one month
after the tenancy terminates, an itemized statement accounting for the proceeds
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 292 ENROLLED
which are retained and giving the reasons therefor. The tenant shall furnish the
lessor a forwarding address at the termination of the lease, to which such statements
may be sent.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.